District of Columbia statutes.
23-534

Applicability.

The provisions of this subchapter shall apply to any seized currency in possession of the Metropolitan Police Department on the effective date of the regulations implementing this subchapter.

History

October 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 402, 47 DCR 4619